bg-BG: Сорт джинджифил: Бейби джинджифил; Джинджифил Бентонг; Син хавайски джинджифил; Обикновен джинджифил; Фингеррут (Kra Chai); Галангал; Корен от куркума; Бял джинджифил; Жълт джинджифил; Друго
nb: Ingefærvariant: Babyingefær; Bentong-ingefær; Blå hawaiisk ingefær; Vanlig ingefær; Fingerrot (kra chai); Galangal; Gurkemeierot; Hvit ingefær; Gul ingefær; Annet
en: Ginger variety: Baby ginger; Bentong ginger; Blue Hawaiian ginger; Common ginger; Fingerroot (Kra Chai); Galangal; Turmeric root; White ginger; Yellow ginger; Other
pl: Odmiana imbiru: Młody imbir (Baby ginger); Imbir Bentong; Niebieski imbir hawajski; Imbir lekarski; Palczatka (Kra Chai); Galangal; Kurkuma; Imbir biały; Imbir żółty; Inna
el: Ποικιλία τζίντζερ: Baby τζίντζερ; Τζίντζερ Bentong; Μπλε τζίντζερ Χαβάης; Κοινό τζίντζερ; Fingerroot (Kra Chai); Γκαλάνγκαλ; Ρίζα κουρκουμά; Λευκό τζίντζερ; Κίτρινο τζίντζερ; Άλλο
es: Variedad de jengibre: Jengibre baby; Jengibre de Bentong; Jengibre azul hawaiano; Jengibre común; Raíz china (Kra Chai); Galanga; Raíz de cúrcuma; Jengibre blanco; Jengibre amarillo; Otra
ko: 생강 품종: 베이비 진저; 벤통 생강; 블루 하와이안 생강; 일반 생강; 핑거루트(크라차이); 갈랑갈; 강황 뿌리; 화이트 진저; 옐로우 진저; 기타
sk-SK: Odroda zázvoru: Mladý zázvor; Zázvor Bentong; Modrý havajský zázvor; Bežný zázvor; Prstnatec (Kra Chai); Galgant; Koreň kurkumy; Biely zázvor; Žltý zázvor; Iné
zh-TW: 薑品種: 仔薑; 文冬薑; 夏威夷藍薑; 普通薑; 甲猜 (泰國沙薑); 南薑; 薑黃; 白薑; 黃薑; 其他
it: Varietà di zenzero: Baby zenzero; Zenzero di Bentong; Zenzero blu hawaiano; Zenzero comune; Zenzero cinese (kra chai); Galanga; Radice di curcuma; Zenzero bianco; Zenzero giallo; Altro
nl: Gemberras: Babygember; Bentong-gember; Blauwe Hawaïaanse gember; Gewone gember; Vingerwortel (kra chai); Laos (galanga); Kurkuma; Witte gember; Gele gember; Overig
tr: Zencefil çeşidi: Bebek zencefil; Bentong zencefili; Mavi Hawaii zencefili; Yaygın zencefil; Parmak kökü (Kra Chai); Havlıcan; Zerdeçal kökü; Beyaz zencefil; Sarı zencefil; Diğer
fi: Inkiväärilajike: Baby-inkivääri; Bentong-inkivääri; Sininen havaijilainen inkivääri; Tavallinen inkivääri; Sormijuuri (kra chai); Galangajuuri; Kurkumajuuri; Valkoinen inkivääri; Keltainen inkivääri; Muu
da: Ingefærsvariant: Babyingefær; Bentong-ingefær; Blå hawaiiansk ingefær; Almindelig ingefær; Fingerroot (Kra Chai); Galangarod; Gurkemejerod; Hvid ingefær; Gul ingefær; Andet
lt-LT: Imbiero veislė: Jaunas imbieras; Bentong imbieras; Mėlynasis Havajų imbieras; Paprastasis imbieras; Pirštuotasis šakniastiebis (Kra Chai); Galangalas; Ciberžolės šaknis; Baltasis imbieras; Geltonasis imbieras; Kita
zh-CN: 生姜品种: 仔姜; 文冬姜; 蓝夏威夷姜; 普通生姜; 凹唇姜 (Kra Chai); 高良姜; 姜黄根; 白姜; 黄姜; 其他
de: Ingwersorte: Baby-Ingwer; Bentong-Ingwer; Blauer Hawaii-Ingwer; Gewöhnlicher Ingwer; Fingerwurz (Kra Chai); Galgant; Kurkumawurzel; Weißer Ingwer; Gelber Ingwer; Sonstige
fr: Variété de gingembre: Gingembre nouveau; Gingembre de Bentong; Gingembre bleu d’Hawaï; Gingembre commun; Clés chinoises (kra chai); Galanga; Racine de curcuma; Gingembre blanc; Gingembre jaune; Autre
ro-RO: Soiul de ghimbir: Baby ghimbir; Ghimbir Bentong; Ghimbir albastru hawaiian; Ghimbir comun; Fingerroot (Kra Chai); Galangal; Rădăcină de turmeric; Ghimbir alb; Ghimbir galben; Altele
sv: Ingefära sort: Babyingefära; Bentong-ingefära; Blå hawaiiansk ingefära; Vanlig ingefära; Fingerrot (Kra Chai); Galangarot; Gurkmejerot; Vit ingefära; Gul ingefära; Övrigt
hu: Gyömbér fajtája: Bébi gyömbér; Bentong gyömbér; Kék hawaii gyömbér; Közönséges gyömbér; Ujjgyökér (Kra Chai); Galangál; Kurkumagyökér; Fehér gyömbér; Sárga gyömbér; Egyéb
hr-HR: Sorta đumbira: Mladi đumbir; Bentong đumbir; Plavi havajski đumbir; Obični đumbir; Prstasti korijen (Kra Chai); Galangal; Korijen kurkume; Bijeli đumbir; Žuti đumbir; Ostalo
th: พันธ์ขิง: ขิงอ่อน; ขิงเบนตง; ขิงฮาวายสีน้ำเงิน; ขิงทั่วไป; กระชาย; ข่า; ขมิ้นชัน; ขิงขาว; ขิงเหลือง; อื่นๆ
ja: ジンジャーの種類: ベビー生姜; ベントン生姜; ブルーハワイアン生姜; 一般的な生姜; フィンガールート (クラチャイ); ガランガル; ターメリックルート; ホワイトジンジャー; イエロージンジャー; その他
ru: Сорт имбиря: Молодой имбирь; Бентонгский имбирь; Гавайский синий имбирь; Обыкновенный имбирь; Крачай (Fingerroot); Галангал; Корень куркумы; Белый имбирь; Желтый имбирь; Другое
pt-BR: Variedade de gengibre: Gengibre baby; Gengibre de Bentong; Gengibre azul havaiano; Gengibre comum; Fingerroot (Kra Chai); Galanga; Raiz de cúrcuma; Gengibre branco; Gengibre amarelo; Outro
pt-PT: Variedade de gengibre: Gengibre baby; Gengibre bentong; Gengibre azul do Havai; Gengibre comum; Fingerroot (Kra Chai); Galanga; Raiz de curcuma; Gengibre branco; Gengibre amarelo; Outra
vi: Giống gừng: Gừng non; Gừng Bentong; Gừng xanh Hawaii; Gừng thường; Ngải bún (Kra Chai); Riềng; Củ nghệ; Gừng trắng; Gừng vàng; Khác
sl-SI: Sorta ingverja: Mladi ingver; Ingver Bentong; Modri havajski ingver; Navadni ingver; Prstasta korenina (Kra Chai); Galangal; Korenina kurkume; Beli ingver; Rumeni ingver; Drugo
cs: Odrůda zázvoru: Mladý zázvor; Bentong zázvor; Modrý havajský zázvor; Běžný zázvor; Fingerroot (krachai); Galgán; Kurkuma; Bílý zázvor; Žlutý zázvor; Ostatní